Hawaii, session 2025, HB967.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State is committed to promoting sustainable economic development, enhancing local food production, improving access to healthy food, promoting climate change adaptation and mitigation, minimizing food waste, and reducing food insecurity.  This commitment is evident through initiatives such as: (1)  The Hawaii sustainability 2050 plan highlights Hawaii's overall economic, climate, and food system-related goals; (2)  Act 151, Session Laws of Hawaii 2019, which mandates doubling local food production and increasing food exports by 2030; and (3)  Acts 175 and 176, Session Laws of Hawaii 2021, which establish goals for local food procurement in schools and other government entities, with a target of fifty per cent locally sourced food by 2050. Despite these efforts and more, high food insecurity and barriers to local food production in Hawaii remain.  According to a recent report by the Hawaii Food Bank, nearly one-third of households are food insecure, and food insecurity rates are consistently higher than the national average.  Additionally, a recent study found that only twelve per cent of households maintain a fourteen-day emergency supply of food, water, and medicine, as recommended by emergency managers. The legislature further finds that achieving a sustainable, resilient, and equitable food system requires collaboration across state agencies, producers, retailers, non-governmental organizations, and community members.  Such a system can enhance environmental, economic, social, and cultural health, well-being, and equity while also responding effectively to disasters and crises.  Interagency coordination and an integrated approach are essential to maximizing efficiencies and achieving impact. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a statewide interagency food systems coordination team and an interagency food systems working group within the department of agriculture. SECTION 2. (a)  There is established the statewide interagency food systems coordination team within the department of agriculture for administrative purposes. The statewide interagency food systems coordination team shall develop and oversee the interagency food systems working group established under subsection (b) and a planning process to implement interagency food systems plans and actions. (b)  There is established an interagency food systems working group within the department of agriculture for administrative purposes, whose members shall include but not be limited to: (1)  The chairperson of the board of agriculture, or the chairperson's designee, and the director of business, economic development, and tourism, or the director's designee, who shall serve as co-chairs of the working group; (2)  One member of the house of representatives, to be selected by the speaker of the house of representatives; (3)  One member of the senate, to be selected by the president of the senate; (4)  One representative from the department of education; (5)  One representative from the department of health; (6)  One representative from the office of Hawaiian affairs; (7)  One representative from the office of planning and sustainable development; and (8)  One representative from the agribusiness development corporation. (c)  The co-chairs may invite other representatives of interested organizations with relevant experience and expertise to participate in the interagency food systems working group, as necessary. (d)  The interagency food systems working group shall: (1)  Develop governance, decision-making, and operating protocols; (2)  Coordinate with county and community-led food systems planning processes; (3)  Identify resources for interagency coordination and implementation; (4)  Develop internal and external communication processes; (5)  Create time-bound implementation plans and ways of measuring progress toward statewide food system goals; and (6)  Utilize policy impact analysis tools to evaluate proposed actions. (e) The interagency food systems working group shall submit a report of its activities and any recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session. (f) The department of agriculture shall provide any necessary administrative support to the statewide interagency food systems coordination team and the interagency food systems working group established under this section. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $944,100 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to be allocated as follows: (1)  $399,300 for the establishment of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) food system specialist position within the department of agriculture; (2)  $253,400 for the establishment of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) policy analyst position within the department of agriculture; (3)  $191,400 for the establishment of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) administrative assistant position within the department of agriculture; and (4)  $100,000 for the establishment and operation of the interagency food systems working group established pursuant to section 2 of this Act, to include conducting stakeholder coordination, public meetings, and information management. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________